Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3293.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [3.28] COMMISSION ON GOVERNMENT EFFICIENCY AND WASTE PREVENTION. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Establishment. new text end new text begin The commission on government efficiency and waste prevention is established to oversee and promote policies to improve government efficiency and technological advancement. Government efficiency and modernization is needed to ensure public service. Technological advancement will improve management practices and reduce fraud and misuse of public funds and services. The commission shall oversee these efforts across state agencies. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Membership; duties. new text end new text begin (a) The commission shall consist of the following 14 members: new text end new text begin (1) two members appointed by the governor; new text end new text begin (2) two members appointed by the speaker of the house, who must be nonelected officials; new text end new text begin (3) two members appointed by the minority leader of the house of representatives, who must be nonelected officials; new text end new text begin (4) two members appointed by the majority leader in the senate, who must be nonelected officials; new text end new text begin (5) two members appointed by the minority leader in the senate, who must be nonelected officials; and new text end new text begin (6) one elected official from each legislative caucus in each house. new text end new text begin (b) The chair shall be elected by the membership. The commission shall meet upon the call of the chair or at the request of two or more members. The commission shall keep a permanent record and minutes of the proceedings. new text end new text begin (c) The commission shall develop proposals to streamline government, cut inefficient spending, offer proposals to identify and eliminate waste and fraud, and find the most efficient way to offer services to the citizens of Minnesota. new text end new text begin (d) Each year the commission shall submit proposals for streamlining government or saving money to the leader in each legislative caucus. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Staff support; meeting space; equipment. new text end new text begin The legislative coordinating commission shall provide staff support, meeting space, and access to office equipment and services as needed. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Report. new text end new text begin By December 1, 2026, and each December 1 thereafter, the commission must submit a report to the governor and to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over state government. The report must document the commission's activities during the year and report on identification of waste or fraud in state government. The report must include recommendations on technology advancements to improve management practices and improve services. new text end